Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2704.46
Food for human consumption; agricultural components; oxygen for aquaculture; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:

(1) Any form of animal life of a kind the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption. Animal life includes live poultry and livestock on the hoof when sales are made by the grower, producer, feeder, or any person engaged in the business of bartering, buying, or selling live poultry or livestock on the hoof;

(2) Seeds and annual plants, the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption and which seeds and annual plants are sold to commercial producers of such products, and seed legumes, seed grasses, and seed grains when sold to be used exclusively for agricultural purposes;

(3) Agricultural chemicals, adjuvants, surfactants, bonding agents, clays, oils, and any other additives or compatibility agents for use in commercial agriculture and applied to land or crops and sold in any tax period that has not been closed by the applicable statute of limitations. Agricultural chemicals does not mean chemicals, adjuvants, surfactants, bonding agents, clays, oils, and any other additives or compatibility agents applied to harvested grains stored in commercial elevators; or

(4) Oxygen for use in aquaculture as defined in section 2-3804.01.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 61;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB901, § 23.
July 1, 2026